Utah statutes.
57-10-3.   North to South and East to West coordinate values.
The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth's surface used to express
the geographic position or location or point in the appropriate zone of this
system shall consist of two distances expressed in U.S. survey feet and
decimals of a foot when using the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 and expressed
in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Utah Coordinate System of
1983.
(1)  One of these distances, known as the "x-coordinate" or "E-coordinate,"
shall give the position in an east-west direction; the other, known as the
"y-coordinate" or "N-coordinate," shall give the position in a north-south
direction.
(2)  These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to plane
rectangular coordinate values computed on the systems defined in this chapter
for the monumented points of the North American Horizontal Geodetic Control
Network, as published by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey
(formerly the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey) or its successors.
(3)  Any such station may be used for establishing a survey connection to
either Utah coordinate system.
